Connecticut, session 2026, HB05172.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the sum of ___ dollars be appropriated to the Department of
Transportation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for the
installation and maintenance of radar speed signs alongside Forest Road
in the city of New Haven.